Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 6. State Highway Patrol, Game and Fish Warden and Criminal InvestigatorRetirement
§ 9-3-617.
Refund of contributions upon termination of employment; redeposit of withdrawn contributions; purchase of service credits.

Except as provided in this subsection and subsection (c) of this section, any employee covered by this article who terminates his employment and elects not to continue to be covered by the retirement program is entitled to a refund of his member account together with the regular rate of interest specified by the retirement board. Commencing July 1, 2019 for an employee who has fewer than six (6) years of service, no interest shall accrue to the member account during any period in which the employee is not employed by a participating employer. Refunds may be made only upon written request to the board. Any employee who withdraws from the retirement program under this subsection shall forfeit all rights to further benefits, employer contributions and service credit under this article.

Any employee who later returns to service covered under this article may redeposit the amount of the contributions withdrawn, in lump sum, together with interest, and upon earning not less than two (2) years service credit, may reestablish his service credits as of the time of withdrawal of his contributions. Any redeposit payment pursuant to this subsection shall be made not later than ten (10) years following the date of reemployment or prior to retirement, whichever first occurs.

No employee is entitled to a refund of any contributions if he is employed for a salary by an employer subject to this article.

Any employee may elect to purchase up to five (5) years of service credit for full-time employment in law enforcement which is performed for another state or political subdivision of another state, the federal government or for any public law enforcement agency in Wyoming as authorized and limited by section 415(c) and 415(n) of the Internal Revenue Code and if the employee does not vest in any retirement plan of the agency for which the prior service being purchased was earned. Any employee electing to purchase service credit shall pay into the account a single lump-sum amount equal to the actuarial equivalent of the benefits to be derived from the service credit computed on the basis of actuarial assumptions approved by the board and the individual’s attained age and average salary for the highest three (3) continuous years of covered service. The lump sum may be paid with personal funds or, subject to rules and regulations established by the board, through rollover contributions. Unless received by the retirement program in the form of a direct rollover, the rollover contribution shall be paid to the program on or before sixty (60) days after the date it was received by the member. Service credit purchased under this subsection shall not be used to determine vested eligibility to receive benefits under this article.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.17; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-117; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 2001, ch. 115, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (d), inserted “as authorized and limited by section 415(c) and 415(n) of the Internal Revenue Code and,” and added the present third and fourth sentences.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “interest” for “regular interest” in the first sentence and “ten (10)” for “seven (7)” in the second sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “refund of his member account together” for “refund of his contributions together” near the middle of the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted "in this subsection and subsection (c) of this section" for "in subsection (c) of this section" and added the second sentence.

Reestablishing service credit. —

Laws 2001, ch 115, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S. 9-3-617(b), as amended under Section 1 of this act, any contributing member of the Wyoming State Highway Patrol, Game and Fish Warden and Criminal Investigator Retirement Act as of July 1, 2001, who is eligible for reestablishing service credit under W.S. 9-3-617(b), shall make the redeposit payment required by W.S. 9-3-617(b) not later than July 1, 2008. Failure to make the required payment on or before July 1, 2008, shall result in forfeiture of any right to reestablish service credit in accordance with W.S. 9-3-617(b).”

Laws 2018, ch. 31, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to the distribution
of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date
of this act.

“Nothing in
this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this
act.”

Laws 2019, ch. 52, § 2, provides: "This act shall apply to the distribution of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date of this act."

§ 9-3-618.
Disposition of funds; designated custodian of monies.

Funds accruing to the retirement program under this article shall be commingled with all money on deposit with the state treasurer in the Wyoming retirement account. The board may designate the state treasurer or a custodial bank approved by the state treasurer as the custodian of the monies and shall administer them in accordance with W.S.

9-3-424

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.18; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-118; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 2001, ch. 115, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Wyoming retirement account” for “Wyoming retirement fund.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-619.
Payment of employers' contribution from highway fund, game and fish fund and attorney general budget.

Provision for the payment of the employers’ contribution under this article shall be made in the budget of the Wyoming highway patrol division as approved by the department of transportation out of the state highway fund, in the budget of the Wyoming game and fish commission out of the game and fish fund and in the budget of the attorney general for the division of criminal investigation and for capitol police.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.19; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-119; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1996, ch. 68, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to division of criminal investigation in the office of attorney general, see §

9-1-611

.

As to Wyoming game and fish commission, see §

23-1-201

.

§ 9-3-620.
Exemption of benefits from state and local taxes, execution and attachment; benefits paid under qualified domestic relations order.

Benefits and allowances set forth under this article are exempt from any state, county or municipal tax and are not subject to execution or attachment by trustee process or otherwise, in law or equity, or under any other process, and are not assignable except as specially provided in this article.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, benefits and allowances under this article may be paid in accordance with qualified domestic relations orders pursuant to W.S.

9-3-426

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-11.20; W.S. 1977, § 31-3-120; Laws 1983, ch. 154, § 1; 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1993, ch. 149, § 1.